Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202669-2426
Firearm dealer; distribution of information; Firearm Information Fund; created.

(1) Any firearm dealer licensed pursuant to 18 U.S.C. 923 shall distribute to all firearm purchasers:

(a) Information developed by the Department of Health and Human Services regarding the dangers of leaving loaded firearms unattended around children; and

(b) Information on suicide prevention, including materials that provide evidence-based information aligned with best practices in suicide prevention. Such materials shall include information on the 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline or other similar resources. The Nebraska State Patrol shall maintain and publish a list of materials that may be used to comply with this subdivision.

(2) There is hereby created the Firearm Information Fund. Private contributions shall be credited by the State Treasurer to such fund for the implementation of the provisions of this section.

Laws 1993, LB 117, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 367;

Laws 2023, LB50, § 33.